California, session 20252026, AB548.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13650 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:13650. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Vulnerable noncitizens, asylees, and refugees are important to the fabric of our society.(2) Regardless of their legal distinctions, noncitizens face many of the same challenges integrating into the state and are often living in the same communities.(3) Refugees, asylees, and other noncitizens are granted different services due to the legal distinction of when they were identified, with refugees often being identified in the country of origin and asylees in the country of arrival.(4)Between 2017 and 2019, the number of applicants granted asylum increased from 26,199 applicants to 46,508 applicants, representing a 56-percent increase. In 2019 alone, California was the settlement state for 34 percent of all new asylees, which was the highest rate of all states.(4) In 2022, California was the settlement state for 24 percent of all individuals granted asylum, the highest percentage of all states. Between 2020 and 2022, the number of individuals granted asylum who live in California ranged from 5,585 to 2,684, with 3,442 asylees living in California in 2022.(5) Research indicates that while individuals granted asylum in this state are given eligibility to a wide range of benefits, most asylees do not get these benefits due to the lack of case management services and assistance in navigating the social safety net and health care systems.(6) The state-funded Trafficking and Crime Victim Assistance Program (TCVAP) provides critical benefits and services to noncitizen victims of human trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes. TCVAP benefits and services mirror those that are available to refugees after initial resettlement. These vulnerable noncitizens would benefit from initial case management services.(7) Studies show that with proper case management support, noncitizens are better able to secure the benefits for which they are eligible, and find employment and bring immense contributions to the economy.(b) (1) The Enhanced Services for Asylees and Vulnerable Noncitizens (ESAVN) program is hereby established to provide resettlement services for persons who are currently residing in California and who are granted asylum by the United States Attorney General or the United States Secretary of Homeland Security pursuant to Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code or who are eligible for assistance and services under Section 13283. who meet both of the following conditions:(A) Entered the United States.(B) Are screened by the United States Department of Homeland Security during January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2026, inclusive.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a person may show that they are currently residing in California with any of the following:(A) California driver’s license or California identification card.(B) Utility bill.(C) Rental history.(c) For purposes of this chapter, “vulnerable noncitizen” means any individual who would be eligible for services under Section 13283. “eligible person” means an individual who meets the criteria described in subdivision (b).(d) Grants or contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be executed only with nonprofit organizations that meet the requirements set forth in paragraph (3) or (5) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code and have at least three years one year of experience with both of the following:(1) Providing case management services, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 13651.(2) Providing culturally and linguistically appropriate services.(e) The department shall require qualified nonprofit organizations awarded contracts or grants pursuant to this section to report, monitor, or audit the services provided, as determined by the department.(f) Funds allocated for these services may also be used to conduct a formal evaluation of the services provided by a qualified entity, as determined by the department.SEC. 2. Section 13651 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:13651. (a) The program shall provide culturally appropriate and responsive case management services for asylees and vulnerable noncitizens eligible persons for up to 90 days within the first year following the grant of asylum or after having been deemed eligible for services under Section 13283. eligible person being screened by the United States Department of Homeland Security.(b) Case management services under the program shall include assistance in identifying and applying for all benefits to which the eligible person is legally entitled, including cultural orientation and integration programs, support in accessing and navigating the public benefits and health care systems, community connection and relationship building, English language instruction, and employment training, job placement assistance, and professional recredentialing and licensing application assistance.(c) (1) The department shall, in collaboration with service providers, determine outcome metrics to define program success.(2) The department shall collect data from grantees related to the outcome metrics determined pursuant to paragraph (1). The department shall post the findings on its internet website.